Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4110.02
Health care review committee; preferred provider organization; exemption from liability.

A person who, in good faith and without malice, takes any action or makes any decision or recommendation as a member, agent, or employee of a health care review committee or who furnishes any records, information, or assistance to such a committee shall not be subject to liability for civil damages or any legal action in consequence of such action, nor shall the preferred provider organization which established the committee or the officers, directors, employees, or agents of the preferred provider organization be liable for the activities of any such person. This section shall not be construed to relieve any person of liability arising from treatment of a patient.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 102.